Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 25. Motor Vehicle Transactions.

Cross references. —

For provision providing legislative findings and intent for the 2018 amendments to this chapter, see sec. 1, ch. 50, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 79, SLA 2002, provides that this chapter applies to a franchise that is entered into on or after July 1, 2002.